Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB766.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Article X of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a subarticle to read:(e) Child Care CenterSection 1090. Attendance Eligibility.--(a) Notwithstanding 55 Pa. Code § 3270.3a (relating to applicability-statement of policy), 55 Pa. Code Ch. 3270 (relating to child care centers) shall not apply to a part-day school-age program for children who meet any of the following:(1) Who, ninety days before the beginning of the upcoming school year, are eligible to attend kindergarten in the upcoming school year, as defined by the local school district's age <--<--12345678910111213141516171819 requirements.(2) Are attending kindergarten and are under sixteen years of age.(b) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Part-day school-age program." A program that operates for less than ninety consecutive days per calendar year from the date the program opens to the date the program closes.Section 2. The provisions of 55 Pa. Code § 3270.3a are abrogated insofar as they are inconsistent with the addition of section 1090 of the act.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.(E) CHILD CARE CENTERSECTION 1090. ATTENDANCE ELIGIBILITY.--NOTWITHSTANDING 55 PA. CODE § 3270.3A (RELATING TO APPLICABILITY-STATEMENT OF POLICY), 55 PA. CODE CH. 3270 (RELATING TO CHILD CARE CENTERS) DOES NOT APPLY TO A PART-DAY SCHOOL-AGE PROGRAM THAT MEETS ALL OF THE FOLLOWING CRITERIA:(1) THE PROGRAM OPERATES FOR LESS THAN NINETY CONSECUTIVE DAYS IN A CALENDAR YEAR, MEASURED FROM THE DATE THE PROGRAM OPENS TO THE DATE THE PROGRAM CLOSES.(2) THE PROGRAM PROVIDES CARE TO CHILDREN WHO, AS OF NINETY DAYS PRIOR TO THE START OF THE UPCOMING SCHOOL YEAR, ARE ENROLLED IN KINDERGARTEN IN THE UPCOMING SCHOOL YEAR, AS DETERMINED UNDER THE AGE REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE LOCAL SCHOOL DISTRICT.(3) THE PROGRAM IS REGISTERED WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AS AN ORGANIZED CAMP.SECTION 2. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY.20250SB0766PN1223 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930